California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
A program administrator shall not permit contractors or other third parties to advertise the availability of assessment contracts that are administered by the program administrator, or to solicit property owners on behalf of the program administrator, unless both of the following requirements are met:

(a) The contractor or third party maintains in good standing an appropriate license from the Contractors’ State Licensing Board, as well as any other permits, licenses, or registrations required for engaging
 in its business in the jurisdiction where it operates, and maintains the required bond and insurance coverage pursuant thereto.

(b) The program administrator obtains the contractor’s or third party’s written agreement that the contractor or third party will act in accordance with applicable advertising and marketing laws and regulations, and all other applicable laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5923.

(a) A program administrator shall not provide any direct or indirect cash payment or other thing of material value to a contractor or third party in excess of the actual price charged by that contractor or third party to the property owner for the sale and installation of one or more
 efficiency improvements financed by an assessment
 contract.

(b) A program administrator shall not reimburse a contractor or third party for expenses for advertising and marketing campaigns and
 collateral. A program administrator may reimburse a contractor’s bona fide and reasonable training expenses related to PACE financing, provided that:

(1) The training expenses are actually incurred by the contractor.

(2) The reimbursement does not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per each salesperson or agent of the contractor who participated in the training.

(3) The reimbursement is paid directly to the contractor, and is not paid to its salespersons or agents.

(c) A program
 administrator shall not provide any direct cash payment or other thing of value to a property owner explicitly conditioned upon that property owner entering into an assessment contract. Notwithstanding the above, programs or promotions that offer reduced fees or interest rates to property owners are neither a direct cash payment or “other thing of value,” provided that the reduced fee or interest rate is reflected in the assessment contract and in no circumstance provided to the property owner as cash consideration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5924.

A program administrator, contractor, or a third party shall not make any representation as to the tax deductibility of an assessment contract unless that representation is consistent with representations, statements, or opinions of the Internal Revenue Service or applicable state tax agency with regard to the tax treatment of PACE assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5925.

A program administrator shall not provide to a contractor or third party engaged in soliciting assessment contracts on its behalf any information that discloses the amount of funds for which a property owner is eligible under a PACE assessment or the amount of equity in a property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5926.

A contractor shall not provide a different price for a project financed by a PACE assessment than the contractor would provide if paid in cash by the property owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5940.

(a) It shall be unlawful to commence work under a home improvement contract, or deliver any property or perform any services other than obtaining building permits or other similar services preliminary to the commencement of work, and the home improvement contract shall be unenforceable, if both of the following occur:

(1) The property owner entered into the home improvement contract based on the reasonable belief that the work would be covered by the PACE program.

(2) The property owner applies for, accepts, and cancels the PACE financing within the right to cancel period set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 5898.16 or applies for but is not approved for PACE financing in the amount requested by the
 property owner.

(b) If work has commenced in violation of subdivision (a), then:

(1) The contractor is entitled to no compensation for that work.

(2) The contractor shall restore the property to its original condition at no cost to the property owner.

(3) The contractor shall immediately and without condition return all money, property, and other consideration given by the property owner. If the property owner gave any property as consideration and the contractor does not or cannot return it for whatever reason, the contractor shall immediately return the fair market value of the property or its value as designated in the contract, whichever is greater.

(c) (1) If the
 contractor has delivered any property to the property owner pursuant to a contract that is unenforceable under subdivision (a), the property owner shall make the property available to the contractor for return within 90 days of execution of the contract provided that:

(A) The provisions of subdivision (b) have been met.

(B) The property can be practically returned to the contractor and removed, at the contractor’s expense, without leaving any damage to the property owner’s property.

(2) Failure of the contractor to comply with this subdivision shall allow the property owner to retain without obligation in law or equity any property provided pursuant to the unenforceable contract.

(d) The property owner may waive the requirements in subdivision (a) if
 all the following are met:

(1) The contract is executed in connection with the making of emergency or immediately necessary repairs to protect persons or real or personal property.

(2) The property owner initiated the contract for the emergency repair or immediately necessary repair.

(3) The property owner provides a separate statement that is handwritten in ink by a property owner and dated and signed by each property owner, describing the situation that requires immediate remedy, and expressly acknowledges that the contractor has informed them of his or her right to cancel and that he or she waive the right to cancel the sale.

(e) If the property owner waives his or her right to cancel on the home improvement contract to allow the home improvement
 contractor to proceed with installation, and then cancels his or her PACE financing or is not approved for PACE financing in the amount requested by the property owner, it shall not invalidate the home improvement contract.

(f) This section does not authorize the commencement of work under a home improvement contract if the commencement of work is prohibited by Sections 22684, 22686, or 22687 of the Financial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 798, Sec. 15.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5954.

(a) For each PACE program that it administers, a program administrator shall submit a report to the public agency no later than February 1 for the activity that occurred between July 1st through December 31st of the previous year, and another report no later than August 1 for the activity that occurred between January 1st through June 30th of that year. Those reports shall contain the following information, along with all methodologies and supporting assumptions or sources relied upon in preparing the report:

(1) The number of PACE assessments funded, by city, county, and ZIP Code.

(2) The aggregate dollar amount of PACE assessments funded, by city, county, and ZIP Code.

(3) The average dollar amount of PACE assessments funded, by city, county, and ZIP Code.

(4) The categories of installed efficiency improvements whether energy or water efficiency, renewable energy, wildfire safety improvements, or seismic improvements, and the percentage of PACE assessments represented by each category type, on a number and dollar basis, by city, county, and ZIP Code.

(5) The definition of default used by the program administrator.

(6) For each delinquent assessment:

(A) The total delinquent amount.

(B) The number and dates of missed payments.

(C) ZIP Code, city, and county in which the underlying property is located.

(7) For each defaulted assessment:

(A) The total defaulted amount.

(B) The number and dates of missed payments.

(C) ZIP Code, city, and county in which the underlying property is located.

(D) The percentage the defaults represent of the total assessments within each ZIP Code.

(E) The total number of parcels defaulted and the number of years in default for each property.

(8) The estimated total amount of energy saved, and the estimated total dollar amount of those savings by
 property owners by the efficiency improvements installed in the calendar year, by city, county, and ZIP Code. In addition, the report shall state the total number of energy savings improvements, and number of improvements installed that are qualified for the Energy Star program of the United States Environmental Protection Agency, including the overall average efficiency rating of installed units for each product type.

(9) The estimated total amount of renewable energy produced by the efficiency improvements installed in the calendar year, by city, county, and ZIP Code. In addition, the report shall state the total number of renewable energy installations, including the average and median system size.

(10) The estimated total amount of water saved, and the estimated total dollar amount of such savings by property owners, by city, county, and ZIP Code. In addition, the report shall
 state the total number of water savings improvements, the number of efficiency improvements that are qualified for the WaterSense program of the United States Environmental Protection Agency, including the overall average efficiency rating of installed units for each product type.

(11) The estimated amount of greenhouse gas emissions reductions.

(12) The estimated number of jobs created.

(13) The average and median amount of annual and total PACE assessments based on ZIP Code, by city, county, and ZIP Code.

(14) The number and percentage of homeowners over 60 years old by city, county, and ZIP Code.

(b) All reports submitted pursuant to this section shall include only aggregate data, and
 shall not include any nonpublic personal information.

(c) A public agency that receives a report pursuant to this section shall make the data publicly available on its internet website.

(d) This section does not limit another governmental or regulatory entity from establishing reporting requirements.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837, Sec. 17) by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 265.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837)
-------------------------------------------

5954.

(a) For each PACE program that it administers, a program administrator shall submit a report to the public agency no later than February 1 for the activity that occurred between July 1st through December 31st of the previous year, and another report no later than August 1 for the activity that occurred between January 1st through June 30th of that year. Those reports shall contain the following information, along with all methodologies and supporting assumptions or sources relied upon in preparing the report: 

(1) The number of PACE assessments funded, by city, county, and ZIP Code.

(2) The aggregate dollar amount of PACE assessments funded, by city, county, and ZIP Code.

(3) The average dollar amount of PACE assessments funded, by city, county, and ZIP Code.

(4) The categories of installed efficiency improvements whether energy or water efficiency, renewable energy, or seismic improvements, and the percentage of PACE assessments represented by each category type, on a number and dollar basis, by city, county, and ZIP Code.

(5) The definition of default used by the program administrator.

(6) For each delinquent assessment:

(A) The total delinquent amount.

(B) The number and dates of missed payments.

(C) ZIP Code, city, and county in which the underlying property is located.

(7) For each defaulted assessment:

(A) The total defaulted amount.

(B) The number and dates of missed payments.

(C) ZIP Code, city, and county in which the underlying property is located.

(D) The percentage the defaults represent of the total assessments within each ZIP Code.

(E) The total number of parcels defaulted and the number of years in default for each property.

(8) The estimated total amount of energy saved, and the estimated total dollar amount of those savings by property owners by the efficiency
 improvements installed in the calendar year, by city, county, and ZIP Code. In addition, the report shall state the total number of energy savings improvements, and number of improvements installed that are qualified for the Energy Star program of the United States Environmental Protection Agency, including the overall average efficiency rating of installed units for each product type.

(9) The estimated total amount of renewable energy produced by the efficiency improvements installed in the calendar year, by city, county, and ZIP Code. In addition, the report shall state the total number of renewable energy installations, including the average and median system size.

(10) The estimated total amount of water saved, and the estimated total dollar amount of such
 savings by property owners, by city, county, and ZIP Code. In addition, the report shall state the total number of water savings improvements, the number of efficiency improvements that are qualified for the WaterSense program of the United States Environmental Protection Agency, including the overall average efficiency rating of installed units for each product type.

(11) The estimated amount of greenhouse gas emissions reductions.

(12) The estimated number of jobs created.

(13) The average and median amount of annual and total PACE assessments based on ZIP Code, by city, county, and ZIP Code.

(14) The number and percentage of homeowners over 60 years old by city, county, and ZIP Code.

(b) All reports submitted pursuant to this section shall include only aggregate data, and shall not include any nonpublic personal information.

(c) A public agency that receives a report pursuant to this section shall make the data publicly available on its Internet Web site.

(d) This section does not limit another governmental or regulatory entity from establishing reporting requirements. 

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2029.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837, Sec. 18.   (SB 465)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. IMPROVEMENT BONDS [6400. - 6640.]



  CHAPTER 1. Determination to Issue Bonds [6400. - 6405.]

6400.

The legislative body may determine that serial bonds shall be issued in the manner and form provided in this part to represent assessments of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) or over for the cost of any work authorized in Part 3 (commencing with Section 5100) of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

6402.

If the amount of the unpaid assessment upon any lot or parcel of land is less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150), the assessment shall be collected as provided in Part 3 (commencing with Section 5100) of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.

When the legislative body determines that serial bonds shall be issued to represent the expenses of any proposed work under this division, it shall so declare in the resolution of intention to do the work, and shall specify the rate of interest which the bonds shall bear.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this division, the legislative body may sell to any local, State or National public agency or authority authorized to purchase the same, all or any part of any bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this part, or any bonds issued pursuant to the Improvement Bond Act of 1915, upon the security of assessments levied under this division. Any such bonds may be sold to any such public agency or authority without advertisement or bidding, but shall not be sold for less than par. The interest rate on such bonds shall be the rate fixed therefor by the legislative body, but may be for a lesser rate than that so fixed if the legislative body finds a purchaser at such lesser rate. Upon the sale of any such bonds to any such public agency or authority, the purchase price thereof shall be paid to the contractor or his assigns in lieu of the bonds and in satisfaction of the balance due upon the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6405.

The legislative body of any city may contract with a specially qualified person, firm or corporation to act as fiscal agent. Such contracts may authorize the fiscal agent to act as agent for any city officer or employee in the performance of any duty required to be performed, or in taking any action authorized to be taken in connection with bonds issued pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1363.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Issuance of Bonds [6420. - 6427.]

6420.

After the full expiration of 30 days from the date of the recordation of the warrant, and after the filing of the written statement of all payments received by the contractor or his assignees upon the assessment, the street superintendent shall make and certify to the treasurer a complete list of all assessments unpaid, which amount to one hundred fifty dollars ($150) or over, upon any assessment or diagram number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

6421.

If any person, or his authorized agent, shall at any time before the thirty-first day after the recordation of the warrant present to the treasurer the following:

(a) His affidavit stating that he is the owner of a lot or parcel of land in the list,

(b) The certificate of a searcher of records that he is such owner of record, and

(c) A notice to the treasurer stating that he desires no bond to be issued for the assessments upon his lot or parcel of land, then no such bond shall be issued therefor, and the payee of the warrant, or his assigns, shall retain his right to enforce collection as if the lot or parcel of land had not been so listed by the street superintendent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

6422.

The treasurer shall upon the filing of the list, make out, sign, and issue to the contractor, or other person entitled to the proceeds of the warrant and assessment, a separate bond, representing upon each lot or parcel of land, including each condominium interest as defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code, upon the list the total amount of the assessment against the same, as thereon shown.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

6423.

If a lot or parcel of land is described upon the assessment and diagram by its number or block, or both, and is also designated by its number or block, or both, upon the official map of the city, or upon any map on file in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the lot or parcel of land is situated, it shall be a sufficient description of the lot or parcel of land in the bond to designate it by the number or block, or both, as it appears on the official or recorded map.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6424.

The bonds and interest thereon shall be paid at the office of the treasurer, who shall keep a fund designated by the name of the bonds, into which he shall place all sums paid him for the principal of the bonds and the interest thereon, together with all penalties thereon, and from which he shall disburse such sums, upon the presentation of proper coupons. Under no circumstances shall the bonds or the interest thereon be paid out of any other fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6425.

The treasurer shall keep a register in his office, showing the series, number, date, amount, rate of interest, payee and indorsees of each bond, and the number and amount of each coupon or principal or interest paid by him and shall cancel and file each coupon so paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6426.

If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on any bond or coupon ceases to be such officer before delivery of the bonds to the purchaser thereof, the signature or countersignature appearing either on the bonds or on the coupons, or both, shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such officer had remained in office until the delivery of such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6427.

Bonds issued pursuant to this part shall by their issuance be conclusive evidence of the regularity of all proceedings under this division leading up to such issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Payments on Assessments at Bond [6440. - 6449.]

6440.

After the street superintendent files his list of unpaid assessments with the treasurer, the principal of each unpaid assessment shall thereafter become due and payable to the treasurer in equal annual payments on each October 15th succeeding the September 1st following the date of the bonds until fully paid. The number of annual payments shall correspond to the number of serial payments to be made on the principal of the bonds issued to represent the unpaid assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 825.)
-------------------------------------------

6441.

The first interest payment on the unpaid assessment shall be payable to the treasurer on the April 15th next succeeding the March 1st or the October 15th next succeeding the September 1st, as the case may be, next following the date of the bonds. The following interest payments shall each be for six months interest and shall be payable to the treasurer on each fifteenth day of April and October, the last interest payment coming due the October 15th immediately preceding the last annual payment of the principal of the bonds issued to represent the unpaid assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 825.)
-------------------------------------------

6441.1.

If a remittance to cover a payment of interest or interest and principal to be made to the treasurer prior to a certain date and hour or prior to a certain date before being delinquent is sent through the United States mail, properly addressed with postage prepaid, and the cancellation mark is placed on the evelope after it is deposited in the mail:

(a) Where the cancellation mark shows both date and time, the remittance shall be deemed received on the date shown by the cancellation mark and by the time specified by law for that date.

(b) Where the cancellation mark shows only the date, the remittance shall be deemed received within the time and date specified when the cancellation mark bears a date on or before which payment is required.

The treasurer need not accept such a payment if it is received more than 10 days after the date and time set by law for the payment. This section shall not apply if the letter containing the payment was incorrectly addressed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 650.)
-------------------------------------------

6442.

If any installment of the principal of the unpaid assessment or of interest thereon is not paid to the treasurer on or before the due date of June 1st or December 1st, as the case may be, next preceding the date upon which the coupons representing it are payable to the bondholder, the treasurer shall, after the close of business on the due date, add to the principal or interest so delinquent a penalty of 2 percent of the total amount of such delinquency, and at the beginning of the business on the first day of each succeeding month until such delinquent payment and all penalties thereon are fully paid, he shall add an additional penalty of 2 percent of the amount of such delinquency. The treasurer shall collect such penalties with and as a part of the delinquent payment. Except as hereinafter provided, the 2-percent penalty first imposed and all subsequent penalties shall be paid to the holder of the bond along with and as a part of such defaulted payment. The legislative body conducting the proceedings may elect, in the resolution of intention, to have the treasurer retain the first 2-percent penalty as a cost of servicing the delinquency. In such case, the following sentence shall be substituted for the last sentence of the default clause in the bond form, as set forth in Section 6460: “The 2-percent penalty first imposed shall be retained by the treasurer as a cost of servicing the delinquency and all subsequent penalties shall be paid to the holder of the bond along with and as a part of such defaulted payment.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6443.

At least 15 days before each respective 15th day of April and October, until the assessment is paid in full, the treasurer shall mail, postage prepaid, to each owner of property described in the assessment, at his last known address, as appears upon the tax rolls current at the time of mailing, a postal card notifying him of the amount due and the date when payment is due from him on the assessment and statng that the payment is subject to penalty if not paid on or prior to the due date. The failure of the treasurer to mail the card, or the failure of the property owner to receive it, shall not affect the validity of any penalty or invalidate any act or proceeding. The card shall contain the following in at least 14-point boldface type:

If you do not pay this bill, at the request of the bondholder, your property will be sold by the treasurer.

This bill is not related in any way to your property tax bill. It must be paid separately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 483.)
-------------------------------------------

6444.

The treasurer may accept payments of installments of interest unaccompanied by payments of installments of principal which are due. The acceptance of such interest payments shall not effect the delinquent status of any installments of principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6445.

The treasurer shall, in addition to his other duties, keep a record of all bonds issued by him, of all payments on the bonds with the dates thereof and of all penalties accruing thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6446.

The assessment shall be a lien upon the property affected thereby, with priority as fixed in Section 5373, until the bond issued to represent the assessment and which it is hereby declared does represent the assessement, and the accrued interest thereon and the penalties, if any, shall be fully paid according to the terms thereof, but which lien shall in no event continue beyond four years after the date of the last principal coupon attached thereto, and for the purposes of Section 330 of the Code of Civil Procedure and Section 2911 of the Civil Code said date shall be deemed the “due date” of the last principal coupon attached to said bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 825.)
-------------------------------------------

6447.

The owner of or any person interested in any lot or parcel of land upon which a bond has been issued under the terms of this division may at any time before commencement of proceedings for sale pay off the bond and discharge the land described in the bond from the lien of the assessment. The discharge may be had by paying to the treasurer, for the holder of the bond, the following sums: (a) the unpaid principal sum thereof; (b) if the interest thereon has already been paid to the next succeeding January 2 or July 2, as the case may be, no interest will be payable; (c) if the interest to the next succeeding January 2 or July 2 has not been paid, then the interest to that January 2 or July 2, as the case may be, shall be payable; (d) all penalties accrued and unpaid; and (e) premium, if any, required by Section 6464. For the purpose of this section, a bond shall be deemed to be issued on the 31st day after the recordation of the warrant upon any unpaid assessment for which the legislative body has provided for the issuance of a bond to represent said unpaid assessment or the last date for payment of the assessment, as specified in the statement required by Section 5390, whichever may be later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 202.)
-------------------------------------------

6448.

When all payments on a bond are made to the treasurer, he shall enter the same in his record of the bond and the lien of the assessment shall cease.

The treasurer shall forthwith notify the holder of the bond and call in the bond. When the bond has been presented and paid the treasurer shall enter in his record thereof the amount paid and the date of payment to the holder and shall cancel the bond and file it in his office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

6449.

Whenever a school district acquires property subject to a bond or bonds issued under the terms of this division for unpaid assessments against said property, the district may include in its annual tax levy, in addition to moneys for all other purposes, an amount sufficient to pay the annual payments of principal and interest due on said bond or bonds. Said tax levy may be made notwithstanding that the said tax levy exceeds the maximum tax rate which may otherwise be imposed by law. No school district shall levy the tax authorized by this section for a period in excess of five years with respect to a particular parcel of property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Form and Content of Bonds [6460. - 6467.3.]

6460.

Form of bond. The bond shall be substantially in the following form:

Improvement Bond
Series (designating it), in the City (or County) of (naming it)
$_____No. ____

Under and by virtue of the
 Improvement Act of 1911 (Part 5 of Division 7 of the Streets and Highways Code), I, out of the fund for the above designated improvement bonds, series ____, will pay to ____ or order, the sum of ____ dollars ($____) with interest at the rate of ____ percent per annum, all as is hereinafter specified, and at the office of the Treasurer of the ____ of ____, State of California.

This bond is issued to represent the cost of certain work upon ____, in the ____ of ____, as the same is more fully described in assessment number ____ issued by the street superintendent of said ____, after the acceptance of said work, and recorded in his office. Its amount is the amount assessed in said assessment against the lot or parcel of land numbered therein, and in the diagram attached thereto, as number ____, and which now remains unpaid, and constitutes a lien upon the property affected thereby, as the same is described herein and in said recorded assessment with its diagram, to wit:
 the lot or parcel of land in said ____ of ____, County of ____, State of California.

This bond is payable exclusively from said fund, and neither the (here insert city or county) nor any officer thereof is to be holden for payment otherwise of its principal or interest. The term of this bond is ____ years from the second day of January next succeeding the next September 1st following its date, and at the expiration of said time the whole sum then unpaid shall be due and payable; but on the second day of January of each year, following the next September 1st after its date, an even annual proportion of its whole amount is due and payable, upon presentation of the coupon therefor, until the whole is paid, with all accrued interest at the rate of ____ per centum per annum.

The interest is payable semiannually, to wit: on the second days of January and of July in each year hereafter, upon presentation of the coupons therefor,
 hereto attached, the first of which is for the interest to the next second day of ____, and thereafter the interest coupons are for semiannual interest.

This bond may be redeemed by the owner or any person interested in any lot or parcel of land described herein, in the manner provided in said code, at any time before maturity, and before commencement of proceedings for sale, upon payment to the treasurer, for the holder of this bond, of the amount then unpaid on the principal sum thereof, with interest thereon (if not previously paid) up to the next succeeding January 2 or July 2, as the case may be, at the rate named in the bond, and all penalties accrued and unpaid.

Should default be made in the annual payment upon the principal, or in any payment of interest from the owner of said lot or parcel of land, or anyone in his behalf, the holder of this bond is entitled on or after the second day of January or July, as the
 case may be, following such default to declare the whole unpaid amount to be due and payable, and to have said lot or parcel of land advertised and sold forthwith, in the manner provided by law; provided, however, that any bond may be reinstated after such default in the manner provided in said code. In case of such default there shall be immediately added to such defaulted amount, 2 percent of the amount thereof, and on the first day of each month following such default there shall be added a further penalty of 2 percent of such defaulted amount. The 2 percent penalty first imposed and all subsequent penalties shall be paid to the holder of the bond along with and as a part of such defaulted payment.

At said ____ of ____, this ____ day of ____, in the year one thousand nine hundred and ____.

Treasurer of the ____ of ____.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 104, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

6460.1.

Bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 5330) to represent an assessment against a possessory interest created by a lease in Indian-owned property shall be substantially in the following form:

IMPROVEMENT BOND
Series (designating it), in the City (or County) of (naming it)
$_____No. ____

Under and by virtue of the Improvement Act of 1911 (Part 5 (commencing with Section 6400) of Division 7 of the Streets and Highways Code), I, out of the fund of the above-designated improvement bonds, series ____, will pay to ____ or order, the sum of ____ dollars ($____) with interest at the rate of ____ percent per annum, all as specified herein, and at the office of the Treasurer of the ____ of ____, State of California.

This bond is issued to represent the cost of certain work upon ____, in the ____ of ____, as the work is more fully described in assessment number ____ issued by the street superintendent of the ____, after the acceptance of the work, and recorded in his office. Its amount is the amount assessed in the assessment against the possessory interest created by a lease in the lot or parcel of land numbered therein, and in the diagram attached thereto, as number ____, and which
 now remains unpaid, and is secured by the assignment of a possessory interest, as it is described herein and in the recorded assessment with its diagram, to wit: the lot or parcel of land in the ___ of ___, County of ___, State of California.

This bond is payable exclusively from the fund, and neither the (insert here the city or county) nor any officer thereof is to be holden for payment otherwise of its principal or interest. The term of this bond is ____ years from the second day of January next succeeding the next September 1st following its date and, at the expiration of that time, the whole sum then unpaid shall be due and payable. On the second day of January of each year, following the next September 1st after its date, an even annual proportion of its whole amount is due and payable, upon presentation of the coupon therefor, until the whole is paid, with all accrued interest at the rate of ____ percent per annum.

The interest is payable semiannually on the second days of January and of July in each year hereafter, upon presentation of the coupons therefor, hereto attached, the first of which is for the interest to the next second day of ____, and thereafter the interest coupons are for semiannual interest.

This bond may be redeemed by the owner or any person interested in any possessory interest in the lot or parcel of land described herein, in the manner provided in the Streets and Highways Code, at any time before maturity, and before commencement of proceedings for sale, upon payment to the treasurer, for the holder of this bond, of the amount then unpaid on the principal sum thereof, with interest thereon (if not previously paid) up to the next succeeding January 2nd or July 2nd, as the case may be, at the rate named in the bond, and all penalties accrued and unpaid.

Should default be made in
 the annual payment upon the principal, or in any payment of interest from the holder of the possessory interest, or anyone in his behalf, the holder of this bond is entitled, on or after the second day of January or July, as the case may be, following such default to declare the whole unpaid amount to be due and payable, and to have the possessory estate advertised and sold forthwith, in the manner provided by law for the sale of a lot or parcel of land pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6500).

At the ____ of ____ this ____ day of ____, in the year one thousand nine hundred and ____.

Treasurer of the ____ of ____.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 104, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

6460.5.

The bond shall be manually signed by the treasurer of the city or county, or a facsimile signature may be reproduced thereon.

A facsimile signature of the treasurer is one that is printed, lithographed, engraved, stamped, or otherwise mechanically reproduced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 104, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

6461.

The bonds shall:

(a) Be payable to the party to whom they issue, or to order.

(b) Be serial bonds.

(c) Bear interest at the rate specified in the resolution of intention to do the work, unless the legislative body determines that a lesser rate of interest is appropriate at the time of advertising for bids, in which case a lesser interest rate may be specified in the bid advertisements.

(d) Have annual